Washington statutes.
RCW 21.30.120

Violations—Director's authority—Court actions—Penalties.

(1) If the director believes, whether or not based upon an investigation conducted under RCW 21.30.100 or 21.30.110, that a person has engaged or is about to engage in an act or practice constituting a violation of this chapter or any rule or order hereunder, the director may:

(a) Issue a cease and desist order;

(b) Initiate any of the actions specified in subsection (2) of this section;

(c) Issue an order imposing a civil penalty in an amount which may not exceed ten thousand dollars for any single violation or one hundred thousand dollars for multiple violations in a single proceeding or a series of related proceedings; or

(d) Take disciplinary action against a licensed person as specified in RCW 21.30.350.

(2) The director may institute any of the following actions in the appropriate courts of the state, or in the appropriate courts of another state, in addition to any legal or equitable remedies otherwise available:

(a) A declaratory judgment;

(b) An action for a prohibitory or mandatory injunction to enjoin the violation and to ensure compliance with this chapter or any rule or order of the director;

(c) An action for disgorgement; or

(d) An action for appointment of a receiver or conservator for the defendant or the defendant's assets.

(3) In any action under subsection (2) of this section if the director prevails, the director shall be entitled to costs and to reasonable attorneys' fees to be fixed by the court.

[ 1986 c 14 s 12.]